Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky River Authority

151.700.
Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly declares that based upon an implied contract between the Commonwealth and the United States government through the Secretary of the United States Army and his predecessors, the validity of which is evidenced by over one hundred (100) years of performance by the federal government, it is the responsibility of the United States Army Corps of Engineers and the United States Congress to operate and maintain the locks and dams on the Kentucky River and therefore urges the Congress and the corps to provide the funds necessary to properly maintain the locks and dams, the condition of which the General Assembly finds is deteriorating.

The General Assembly recognizes the historic importance of the Kentucky River locks and dams in providing a source of clean water supply for several hundred thousand citizens of the Commonwealth. Therefore, if the Congress and the corps fail to fulfill their responsibility for the Kentucky River locks and dams as stated in subsection (1) of this section and the Commonwealth thereby must assume ownership of the locks and dams, it shall be the public policy of the Commonwealth to protect the health and welfare of the citizens dependent upon this system of locks and dams for their source of clean water, and to that end, the Commonwealth shall provide for the proper maintenance of the Kentucky River locks and dams through the Kentucky River Authority. It shall be the public policy of the Commonwealth that should the United States Army Corps of Engineers and the United States Congress fail to fulfill their responsibility to maintain and operate the Kentucky River locks and dams, and should all efforts on the part of the Commonwealth fail to force the corps and Congress to fulfill their responsibility, then the Commonwealth shall assume ownership of all United States Army Corps of Engineers property, both real and personal, on or adjacent to the Kentucky River after ninety (90) days from the date on which the corps obtains final authority to dispose of such property. During that ninety (90) day period, the Commonwealth shall publish legal notice of its intention to assume ownership of the property.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

151.705.
Kentucky River Authority — Functions — Public purposes — Management of authority.

The Kentucky River Authority is created to perform the essential governmental functions and public purposes set out in KRS 151.700 to 151.730. The authority shall be a public corporation and independent governmental agency and instrumentality of the state. The responsibilities of the authority shall be managed and implemented by a board of directors as set out in KRS 151.710.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 265, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

151.710.
Membership of Kentucky River Authority — Compensation — Meetings — Administrative regulations.

The Governor shall appoint members to the Kentucky River Authority, created to carry out the essential public purpose of protecting the health and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth as declared in KRS 151.700.

The Governor shall appoint the secretaries of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Energy and Environment Cabinet and ten (10) other persons as the members of the authority. The secretaries may designate alternates. Of the ten (10) persons, one (1) shall be a registered engineer, one (1) an expert in water quality, one (1) a mayor, and one (1) a county judge/executive. The mayor and the county judge/executive shall be officers from counties which obtain the major portion of their water supply from the Kentucky River. Five (5) members shall reside in a county adjacent to the main stem of the Kentucky River, one (1) of the five (5) members residing in counties adjacent to locks and dams one (1) through four (4); and one (1) member shall reside in a county adjacent to either the North Fork, Middle Fork, or South Fork of the Kentucky River. Of the twelve (12) members, only one (1) may be an employee of the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

Of the ten (10) members first appointed, two (2) shall continue in office for terms of one (1) year, two (2) for terms of two (2) years, three (3) for terms of three (3) years, and three (3) for terms of four (4) years, as the Governor designates. At the expiration of the original terms and for all succeeding terms, the Governor shall appoint a successor to the authority for a term of four (4) years in each case. Members may be reappointed. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment to that term. Any member whose term has expired may continue to serve and vote until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

Each member shall receive as compensation one hundred dollars ($100) per day for attending a meeting of the authority.

Any member who misses three (3) consecutive meetings of the authority shall be deemed to have vacated the office. The authority shall declare the office vacant and the office shall be filled as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The authority annually shall elect one (1) of its members as chairman. A quorum for the transaction of business shall be seven (7) members, and a majority of the members present at a meeting may take action on any matter legally before the authority.

Members shall be paid their necessary travel expenses incurred in attending meetings and in the performance of their official duties, in addition to the per diem compensation of one hundred dollars ($100).

The authority shall meet at least quarterly, and may meet upon the call of the chairman.

The chairman shall be paid necessary travel expenses and a one hundred dollar ($100) per diem compensation for conducting official business of the authority.

The authority shall be attached for administrative purposes to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the cabinet shall provide the necessary personnel to provide administrative services for the authority.

The necessary travel expenses and per diem compensation of the members of the authority in attending meetings and in the performance of their official duties shall be paid by the authority.

The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out its duties, and shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 383, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 500, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 229, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 265, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 12, § 42, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 180, effective July 15, 2010.

151.720.
Powers of authority.

The Kentucky River Authority is authorized and empowered to:

Construct, reconstruct, provide for the major maintenance, or repair the locks and dams on the Kentucky River and all real and personal property pertaining thereto, as well as maintain the channel;

Acquire by purchase, exercise of the rights of eminent domain, grant, gift, devise, or otherwise, the fee simple title to or any acceptable lesser interest in any real or personal property and by lease or other conveyance, contract for the right to use and occupy any real or personal property selected in the discretion of the authority as constituting necessary, desirable, or acceptable sites to fulfill its statutory authority and power;

Lease its real or personal property to other state agencies, political subdivisions of the Commonwealth, corporations, partnerships, associations, foundations, or persons as the authority deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section;

Sell or otherwise dispose of its real or personal property in accordance with KRS 56.463 and 45A.045;

Collect water use fees from all facilities using water from the Kentucky River basin, except those facilities using water primarily for agricultural purposes. Facilities charged such a fee may pass on all or any part of the fee;

Issue revenue bonds in accordance with KRS 151.730;

Employ persons to carry out the authority’s responsibilities with revenue from the water use fees, including an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the authority;

Contract for services with other state agencies, political subdivisions of the Commonwealth, corporations, partnerships, associations, foundations, or persons to perform its duties;

Promulgate administrative regulations providing for clean water, which shall not be less stringent than the state and federal regulations for clean water;

Exercise all other powers necessary to perform its public purpose to implement and enforce the plans developed by the authority pursuant to this section and KRS 151.727 and 151.728, and to enforce administrative regulations promulgated by the authority. The long-range water resource plan and drought response plan shall be implemented for the basin upon the direction of the authority;

Develop comprehensive plans for the management of the Kentucky River within the basin, including a long-range water resource plan and a drought response plan. Each county within the basin shall develop a long-range water resource plan and submit it to the authority. The authority, after consultation with the Energy and Environment Cabinet, shall develop a unified long-range water resource plan for the basin. The unified long-range water resource plan shall be implemented over short-range and long-range time periods. The short-range plan shall be for a period of six (6) years and the long-range plan shall be for a period of twenty (20) years. The authority shall conduct a public hearing on the plan prior to its adoption and amend the plan as appropriate based on the comments received. The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall review the draft unified plan and provide comment during the public comment period concerning the consistency of the plan with the state requirements under KRS Chapters 224 and 151. A drought response plan for the basin shall be developed by the authority and shall be coordinated with the Energy and Environment Cabinet to assure consistency with KRS Chapters 224 and 151, and this plan shall be implemented for the basin upon the direction of the authority;

Develop and promote a plan for the protection and use of groundwater within the basin. Administrative regulations may be promulgated implementing the plan, and these regulations shall not be less stringent than state and federal regulations protecting groundwater;

Promote private investment in the installation of hydroelectric generating units on all existing constructed and reconstructed Kentucky River dams under the jurisdiction of the authority, by developing a standard lease, establishing reasonable financial responsibility requirements, verifying that the proposed installation of the hydroelectric unit will not adversely affect the structural integrity of the dam, and adopting a schedule of reasonable fees for water used in the generation of hydroelectric power;

Develop recreational areas within the basin. These recreational areas may be operated and funded by the state Department of Parks, Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves, or other governmental entity as specifically authorized or permitted within the biennial executive budget. There is hereby created the Kentucky River Park to be located as determined by the authority;

Utilize funds provided for recreational purposes within the biennial executive budget for major or minor maintenance if the authority certifies to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that a significant need exists for the repairs and no other funds are available for the maintenance;

Coordinate the Kentucky River basin water resources activities among state agencies;

Report quarterly on all of its activities to the legislative Committee on Appropriations and Revenue;

Receive reports from state agencies on litigation concerning the Kentucky River, which agencies are hereby directed to report to the authority;

Credit to the authority any income derived from the interest earned on the investment of the water use fees collected, which shall be available for the authority’s expenditure; and

Accomplish the watershed management mission of the authority, which is to fulfill the provisions of this section for the Kentucky River basin, the boundary of which shall be defined by a hydrologic map promulgated in an administrative regulation.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 383, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 44, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 500, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 229, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 265, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 139, § 15, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 15, effective February 25, 2010; 2010, ch. 24, § 181, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 50, effective July 14, 2018.

151.723.
Water use fees.

The rate of the water use fees collected by the authority shall be set for each year of the biennium based upon a total amount of funds necessary to carry out only those functions, projects, and expenses authorized by the General Assembly in the authority’s biennial budget.

At the time the authority submits its budget to the Governor’s Office of Policy and Management, it shall certify to the General Assembly the total amount of water use reported for the preceding biennium by users subject to the water use fees. At least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the authority’s budget, the authority shall establish a rate for each water use fee based upon an amount of water use projected for each year of the biennium from the amount reported, calculated to generate the amount of funds necessary to carry out the functions, projects, and expenses which have been authorized by the General Assembly to be funded by the fees. The rate shall be an amount for each one thousand (1,000) gallons of water use and shall be effective for at least one (1) year.

The authority shall define by administrative regulation those uses of the Kentucky River or the waters of the Kentucky River basin subject to a water use fee. Water use fees shall not apply to facilities using water for agricultural purposes. The authority shall collect the fees on a quarterly basis and pay the collected fees into the State Treasury to the credit of a restricted fund for use by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 229, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 265, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

151.725.
Authority’s duty to bring action for penalties or injunctive relief — Venue.

The authority shall bring an action for the recovery of penalties provided for in KRS 151.990, the payment of fees provided for in KRS 151.720, or for a restraining order, or a temporary or permanent injunction for the prevention or correction of a condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of the administrative regulations promulgated by the authority, the long-range water resource plan, or a drought response plan developed by the authority.

All actions for penalties and injunctive relief for violations of the administrative regulations promulgated by the authority, the long-range water resource plan, or a drought response plan developed by the authority shall be brought by the authority in the:

Circuit Court having jurisdiction of the defendant;

Circuit Court of the county in which the condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of the administrative regulations of the authority, the long-range water resource plan or a drought response plan developed by the authority is occurring; or

In the Franklin Circuit Court.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 453, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 229, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

151.727.
Continuing study of water availability and needs of Kentucky River basin — Biennial estimate on costs of water supply needs of Kentucky River basin.

The Kentucky River Authority shall undertake a continuing study of the water available within the Kentucky River and the water needs within the Kentucky River basin. The study shall focus on necessary capital construction to maintain or increase water availability within the Kentucky River, including bringing existing facilities up to acceptable standards or replacing existing facilities where required.

The Kentucky River Authority shall on a biennial basis provide the General Assembly with an estimate of the cost of maintaining or increasing the water available within the Kentucky River in order to meet the water supply needs of the citizens within the Kentucky River basin.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 265, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

151.728.
Preconstruction and construction reports — Long-range planning document — Execution of funded programs.

Beginning with the 2000-2002 biennium and each biennium thereafter, the authority shall submit to the General Assembly a six (6) year program of preconstruction and construction activities to maintain or increase water available within the Kentucky River. The program shall include a two (2) year construction component that shall be implemented as authorized by the General Assembly in the authority’s biennial budget and a four (4) year preconstruction component that shall advise the General Assembly of the consistency of ongoing and long-term planning with the construction activities funded by the General Assembly.

The program shall be developed by considering, at a minimum, the following factors:

The population to be served by the available water;

The social, economic, and environmental impact of program elements;

The condition of existing facilities critical to water availability;

The cost of maintaining, improving, replacing, or removing facilities; and

The dependence of communities within the river basin on specific Kentucky River dam pools or other sources of water.

The program shall include a four (4) year planning document setting out preconstruction activities that include planning and design and an environmental analysis of projects to maintain or increase water available within the Kentucky River and geotechnical and stability evaluations of the Kentucky River locks and dams.

The authority shall provide to the General Assembly a long-range planning document consisting of twenty (20) years for water supply projects being considered by the authority.

The authority shall be responsible for the execution of each six (6) year program as approved and authorized in the budget by the General Assembly and shall report any anticipated deviations from the authorized construction funding or preconstruction program to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 265, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 6 effective July 14, 2000.

151.7282.
Presession reports to legislative committees.

By July 1 of each year preceding the convening of the General Assembly in even-numbered-year regular session, the authority shall provide the projected six (6) year construction and preconstruction program to the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment, the Capital Planning Advisory Board, and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 265, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 58, § 15, effective June 21, 2001; 2010, ch. 135, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

151.729.
Authority’s involvement in requested transfer of drinking water between water utilities involving Kentucky River basin watershed.

At the time a water utility requests a state agency to take action required to allow the transfer between water utilities of drinking water within or into the watershed of the Kentucky River basin, the water utility shall notify the authority of the request that has been made for state agency action. The authority shall review the request and comment on the requested transfer to the state agency within the time period for the review by the state agency.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 265, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 287, § 9, effective July 14, 2000.

151.730.
Revenue bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide, at one (1) time or from time to time, for the issuance of its revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one (1) or more projects undertaken pursuant to KRS 151.720. The principal of and the interest on such bonds shall in each instance be payable solely from a special fund provided for the payment, with revenues derived from water use fees collected from all facilities using water from the Kentucky River basin, except those facilities using water primarily for agricultural purposes, pledged to be set aside and deposited in such special fund. The bonds of any issue may be in one (1) or more series and any one (1) or more such series may enjoy equal or subordinate status with respect to the pledge of funds from which they are payable, shall be dated, shall bear interest, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding the thirtieth anniversary of their respective dates, all as may be provided by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority shall determine the form of bonds including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places for payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. The bonds shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority, and the seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof shall be affixed thereto and attested by the manual signature of the treasurer of the authority, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall have and are hereby declared to have all qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code of the Commonwealth. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The authority may sell such bonds at public sale, and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of KRS 151.720.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or projects for which such bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such a manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund or funds for such bonds or any account or accounts therein as the authority shall have provided in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing such bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

The authority may issue revenue bond anticipation notes.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust indenture, except to the extent of the rights given in this section, may be restricted by such trust indenture or proceedings, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted under this section or under such trust indenture or the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this section or by such trust indenture or proceedings to be performed by the authority or by any officer or employee thereof.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall not be a debt, liability, or obligation of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof and shall not be a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof.

Revenue bonds issued by the authority shall be subject to the jurisdiction and approval of the State Property and Buildings Commission and the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and shall be subject to review by the Office of Financial Management established in KRS 42.0201.

The authority shall not be required to pay any taxes and assessments to the Commonwealth or any county, municipality, or other governmental subdivision of the Commonwealth upon any of its property or upon its obligations or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to the provisions of this section, or upon any moneys, funds, revenues, or other income held or received by the authority and the bonds or notes of the authority and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation, except for death and gift taxes and taxes of transfers.

Contractual expenses to construct, reconstruct, provide for the major maintenance, or repair the Kentucky River locks and dams, or to maintain the channel, or to acquire real or personal property pertaining thereto, or to construct, reconstruct, maintain, or repair such property, shall be paid from the proceeds of the revenue bonds. Expenses for administrative services and necessary travel expenses and per diem compensation of authority members, shall not be paid from the proceeds of the revenue bonds. Nor shall the cabinet’s cost of operating the locks be paid from the proceeds of the revenue bonds.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 383, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 229, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 46, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 567, effective June 20, 2005.